Missouri, session 2026, HB3342.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 1.2070, to read as follows:
1.2070. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no personal
2 property tax levy passed by voters before January 1, 1975, shall apply to motor vehicles.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.